Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PASSENGER RAIL; RAIL CORRIDOR SERVICE ANALYSIS; INTERCITY RAIL; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Corridors; identification and development required. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of transportation must apply to the Federal Railroad Administration's Corridor Identification and Development Program established by the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act under United States Code, title 49, section 25101(a), for planning and development of two intercity passenger rail corridors with service originating in and extending beyond Minnesota. The two routes include: new text end new text begin (1) extension of passenger rail service from St. Paul to Fargo, North Dakota; and new text end new text begin (2) establishment of new passenger rail service from St. Paul to Kansas City, Missouri, that includes service to Northfield, Albert Lea, and Des Moines, Iowa. new text end new text begin (b) Upon successful application and award of development funds from the Federal Railroad Administration for the routes developed in paragraph (a), the commissioner must execute and complete all Step 1 scoping requirements under the Corridor Identification and Development Program for both routes in paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin (a) $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for the following: new text end new text begin (1) intercity passenger rail projects in the Phase I corridors level identified in the 2015 update to the state rail plan under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.03, subdivision 1b; new text end new text begin (2) providing state matching funds for obtaining federal grants to complete the Step 2 service development plan under the Federal Railroad Administration's Corridor Identification and Development Program; new text end new text begin (3) planning, development, and staffing costs for the required application in subdivision 1, paragraph (a), and completion of the Step 1 scoping requirements under subdivision 1, paragraph (b); and new text end new text begin (4) grants to political subdivisions for planning and service development activities consistent with the passenger rail implementation and policy established in the state rail plan under Minnesota Statutes, section 174.03, subdivision 1b, including: new text end new text begin (i) project cost estimates; new text end new text begin (ii) alternatives analysis; new text end new text begin (iii) preliminary engineering; new text end new text begin (iv) environmental analysis; new text end new text begin (v) benefit cost; or new text end new text begin (vi) economic impact analysis. new text end new text begin (b) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. The appropriation is only available for the Minnesota share of project costs. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end